Louisiana, session 2026, SB203.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:325(B)(4) and 325.1(A)(4) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§325. Daily take, possession, and size limits; freshwater recreational fish; possession
of finfish filets prohibited
* * *
B.(1) * * *
* * *
(4) The possession limit for largemouth bass (Micropterus salmoides) and
spotted bass (Micropterus punctulatus) taken south of U.S. Highway 90 shall be
three times the daily take limit when the fisherman holds and is in possession of a
valid recreational fishing license and can show demonstrate to the department's
satisfaction a landing receipt from a public boat launch located south of U.S.
Highway 90 that demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the
fisherman has been actively on the water or at a remote camp that can be accessed
only by water for two days or more. The fish shall be kept whole or whole gutted in
separate bags for each species of fish. The bags shall be marked with the date the fish
were taken, the species, the number of fish contained in the bag, and the name and
license number of the person taking the fish. The fish shall only be in the possession
of the person who took the fish. However, no fisherman shall be actively fishing or
engaged in fishing while in possession of more than the daily take limit.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 203 ENROLLED
* * *
§325.1. Size and possession limits; recreational saltwater finfish; penalties
A.(1) * * *
* * *
(4) The possession limit for red drum and spotted sea trout taken south of
U.S. Highway 90 shall be three times the daily take limit when the fisherman holds
and is in possession of a valid recreational fishing license and can show
demonstrate to the department's satisfaction a landing receipt from a public boat
launch located south of U.S. Highway 90 that demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
department that the fisherman has been actively on the water or at a remote camp
that can be accessed only by water for two days or more. The fish shall be kept
whole or whole gutted in separate bags for each species of fish. The bags shall be
marked with the date the fish were taken, the species, the number of fish contained
in the bag, and the name and license number of the person taking the fish. The fish
shall only be in the possession of the person who took the fish. However, no
fisherman shall be actively fishing or engaged in fishing while in possession of more
than the daily take limit.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.